Louisiana, session 2026, HB363.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:176.2 is hereby amended to read as follows:
§176.2. Extracurricular activities; interscholastic athletics; participation by home
study students and virtual school students
A. A public school shall not disqualify a student from participating in
extracurricular activities or interscholastic athletics solely because the student is
enrolled in an approved home study program, so long as program or virtual school
if the student lives in the attendance zone of the public school.
(1) A student who is enrolled in an approved home study program or virtual
school shall try out or apply for extracurricular activities or interscholastic athletics
at the public school in the same manner, time, and place as the students who attend
the public school.
(2) After the try out or application, should the approved home study student
meet the qualifications for an extracurricular activities club or an interscholastic
athletics team, the approved home study student shall be required to maintain all
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 363 ENROLLED
requirements for participation that a public school student enrolled in that public
school would have to meet in order to participate in the extracurricular activity or the
interscholastic athletics activity, including but not limited to maintaining a minimum
grade point average and complying with disciplinary standards. Failure to meet the
requirements with respect to a minimum grade point average or failure to adhere to
the disciplinary standards shall be grounds for the school to remove the approved
home study student from participation in the extracurricular activities club or the
interscholastic athletics team.
B. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no public school may be
a member of, or participate in any competition sponsored by, any interscholastic
extracurricular athletic association or organization that denies eligibility to a student
solely on the basis of the student's enrollment in an approved home study program
or virtual school.
C. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Approved home study program" means a home study program approved
as provided for in R.S. 17:236.1.
(2) "Virtual school" shall be defined as in R.S. 17:236.3.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.